Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.580

Protection order commissioners—Appointment authorized.

In each county, the superior court may appoint one or more attorneys to act as protection order commissioners pursuant to this chapter to exercise all powers and perform all duties of a court commissioner appointed pursuant to RCW 2.24.010, provided that such positions may not be created without prior consent of the county legislative authority. A person appointed as a protection order commissioner under this chapter may also be appointed to any other commissioner position authorized by law. Protection order commissioners should receive training as specified in RCW 7.105.255.

[ 2021 c 215 s 71.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.